Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Involvement of Young People in School Governance.

Sec. 14.14.250.
Establishment of committee.

A school board may create a committee or other advisory body on the involvement of young people in school governance.

History.

(§ 4 ch 40 SLA 1972)

Sec. 14.14.260.
Composition and chairman.

The committee may consist of not more than nine members, drawn from the fields of public affairs, education, the sciences, the professions, other fields of private endeavor, from the state or local service, and three additional members from the 17-22 age group, and shall include women and representatives of minority groups.
The members shall be appointed by the board in the manner prescribed by the board without regard to political affiliation and shall serve at the pleasure of that body.
One member shall be designated by the board as chairman of the committee.

History.

(§ 4 ch 40 SLA 1972)

Sec. 14.14.270.
Compensation and per diem.

Members of the committee or other advisory body serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses as may be authorized by the board.

History.

(§ 4 ch 40 SLA 1972)

Sec. 14.14.280.
Functions of the committee.

The committee shall establish procedures to enable it to recommend annually to the board a group of promising young men and women from whom the board may select interns and youth voting members of district committees or other advisory bodies. The committee, in establishing these procedures, shall enlist the aid of district residents who are actively interested in working with young people. Following adoption of the procedures, the committee shall accept applications from individuals and nominations for consideration, and shall interview all applicants or nominees.

Recommendations of the committee shall be limited to young people who

have a capacity, desire, interest, ability, and potential for leadership and service to the community and to the state;

will have attained the age of 17 but not the age of 22 before the beginning of their service.

Annually, the committee shall evaluate the program and shall submit a written report to the board.

History.

(§ 4 ch 40 SLA 1972)

Sec. 14.14.290.
Interns.

An intern may be appointed to serve on the staff of the board or the district administrator for a period of time prescribed by the board, with a maximum of one year.
An intern may be assigned responsibilities in any office, department, or agency of the district.
Service begins at a time prescribed by the board.
Interns shall be appointed without regard to political affiliation.
Salaries shall be individually established by the board on the basis of prior experience and the responsibilities of the position to which the intern is assigned.

History.

(§ 4 ch 40 SLA 1972)

Sec. 14.14.300.
Appointment to district committees or other advisory bodies.

Notwithstanding AS

39.05.100

or a provision of law relating to age, the board may appoint any 17-21 year old district resident to a district committee or advisory body if recommended by the youth involvement committee.

A young person recommended by the committee may be appointed to district committees or advisory bodies with special qualifications for membership if the proposed nominee meets the required qualifications set by law, except for age.

An individual appointed to a district committee or advisory body under this section is entitled to the rights, privileges, and responsibilities of other members, and the appointment is subject to confirmation by the board when required by law. An additional seat on a district committee or advisory body is not created by virtue of AS

14.14.250

—

14.14.310

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 40 SLA 1972)

Sec. 14.14.310.
Definitions.

In AS

14.14.250

—

14.14.310

,

“board” means the governing body of a borough or city school district or regional educational attendance area;

“district” means a borough, city, or regional educational attendance area.

History.

(§ 4 ch 40 SLA 1972; am § 11 ch 124 SLA 1975)